Texas, session 892, HB237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Title 7, Government Code, is amended by adding Chapter 795 to read as follows: CHAPTER 795. INTERSTATE COMPACT FOR ANIMAL HEALTH INITIATIVES Sec. 795.001.  AUTHORITY TO DEVELOP AND EXECUTE COMPACT. On behalf of this state, the governor shall develop and execute an interstate compact for animal health initiatives among interested states. Sec. 795.002.  CONGRESSIONAL APPROVAL NOT REQUIRED. (a) It is the intent of the legislature that the compact developed and executed under this chapter not require congressional approval. (b)  The compact may not increase the political power of the compacting states in relation to the federal government. Sec. 795.003.  INTERSTATE COMPACT PROVISIONS. (a) The compact authorized by this chapter must provide for joint action among compacting states on matters that include: (1)  sharing state resources in order to build a research center, a comprehensive surveillance system, and a response plan for any animal health disease or parasitic insect outbreaks on state land to prevent or treat animal health outbreaks; (2)  sharing other animal health resources to ensure the protection of livestock, wildlife, and other animals; and, (3)  providing mutual support for the resources, including infrastructure, equipment, software, and personnel, that are necessary or convenient to ensure that the purpose describes by this section are adequately supported and achieved. (b)  The compact authorized by this chapter may, at the discretion of individual states, provide for joint action among compacting states on the execution and enforcement of agreements or memoranda of understanding with the United States Department of Agriculture, the United States Food and Drug Administration, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, or any other federal agency for the purpose of protecting and researching animal health. (c)  The compact may authorize the transfer of money from other compacting states to this state for the purpose of supporting animal health research and response activities.  Any money received under this subsection must be deposited in a fund that shall be used for expenses related to the planning, development, operation, or coordination of animal health initiatives undertaken pursuant to this compact. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect immediately if it receives a vote of two-thirds of all the members elected to each house, as provided by Section 39, Article III, Texas Constitution. If this Act does not receive the vote necessary for immediate effect, this Act takes effect September 1, 2025.